src/fst/orthography/spellrelax-mobile-keyboard.regex
# Meadow and Eastern Mari (also Hill Mari) #SoMe spellrelax file.

[ ҥ (->)  н ,
Ҥ (->)  Н ,
ӓ (->)  а ,
Ӓ (->)  А ,
ӧ (->)  о ,
Ӧ (->)  О ,
ӹ (->)  ы ,
Ӹ (->)  Ы ,
ӱ (->)  у ,
Ӱ (->)  У ]
.o.
[ о (->)  а || _ .#. ]
.o.
[ е (->)  а || _ .#. ]
;


# Explanation:
# lexical side (->) input 
# Or, in other words:
# correct (->) in use out there
